Nebraska, session 109, LB830.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB830 LB830
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 24-201.01, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
24-201.01 On July 1, 2024, the annual salary of the Chief Justice
and the judges of the Supreme Court shall be two hundred twenty-five
thousand fifty-five dollars and thirty-five cents. On July 1, 2025, the
annual salary of the Chief Justice and the judges of the Supreme Court
shall be two hundred twenty-eight thousand four hundred thirty-one
dollars and eighteen cents. On July 1, 2026, the annual salary of the
Chief Justice and the judges of the Supreme Court shall be two hundred
thirty-one thousand eight hundred fifty-seven dollars and sixty-five
cents.
The Chief Justice and the judges of the Supreme Court shall hold no
other public office of profit or trust during their terms of office nor
accept any public appointment or employment under the authority of the
government of the United States for which they receive compensation for
their services. Such salaries shall be payable in equal monthly
installments.
Sec. 2. Section 50-123.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
50-123.01 Each member of the Legislature shall receive a salary in
an amount equal to the maximum authorized by the Constitution of
Nebraska. Such salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments.
Sec. 3. Section 53-112, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-112 Each member of the commission shall receive an annual salary
of not to exceed twelve thousand five hundred dollars, to be fixed by the
Governor, payable in equal installments monthly, and in addition expenses
authorized in section 53-113 incurred on behalf of the commission. The
salary of the executive director of the commission shall be fixed by the
commission, payable in equal installments monthly.
Sec. 4. Section 71-1131, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-2-

LB830 LB830
2026 2026
amended to read:
71-1131 If the subject cannot afford to pay, the county shall pay
court costs, costs of emergency custody, and related expenses for a
petition filed pursuant to the Developmental Disabilities Court-Ordered
Custody Act, including the costs of legal counsel appointed to represent
the subject and any expert hired to evaluate and testify on behalf of the
subject. In counties having a public defender, the court may appoint the
public defender as legal counsel for the subject. The county shall be
responsible for the cost of transporting the subject to and from court
hearings under the act and to any emergency custody or other custody
ordered under the act. The department shall pay the costs of the
department's evaluations of the subject, the costs of the plans completed
by the department and the independent mental health professional, and the
costs of the court-ordered custody and treatment of the subject following
an order of disposition, except as provided by sections 83-363 to 83-379
83-380.
Sec. 5. Section 72-201, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
72-201 (1) The Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall consist of
five members to be appointed by the Governor with the consent of a
majority of the members elected to the Legislature. One member shall be
appointed from each of the congressional districts as the districts were
constituted on January 1, 1961, and a fifth member shall be appointed
from the state at large. One member of the board shall be competent in
the field of investments. The initial members shall be appointed to take
office on October 1, 1955, and shall hold office for the following
periods of time: The member from the first congressional district for one
year; the member from the second congressional district for two years;
the member from the third congressional district for three years; the
member from the fourth congressional district for four years; and the
member from the state at large for five years. As the terms of the
-3-

LB830 LB830
2026 2026
members expire, the Governor shall appoint or reappoint a member of the
board for a term of five years, except members appointed to fill
vacancies whose tenures shall be the unexpired terms for which they are
appointed. If the Legislature is not in session when such members, or
some of them, are appointed by the Governor, such members shall take
office and act as recess appointees until the Legislature next thereafter
convenes. The compensation of the members shall be fifty dollars per day
for each day's time actually engaged in the performance of the duties of
their office. Each member shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred while
upon business of the board as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
The board shall cause all school, university, agricultural college, and
state college lands, owned by or the title to which may hereafter vest in
the state, to be registered, leased, and sold as provided in sections
72-201 to 72-251 and shall have the general management and control of
such lands and make necessary rules not provided by law. The funds
arising from these lands shall be disposed of in the manner provided by
the Constitution of Nebraska, sections 72-201 to 72-251, and other laws
of Nebraska not inconsistent herewith.
(2) No person shall be eligible to membership on the board who is
actively engaged in the teaching profession, who holds or has any
financial interest in a school land lease, who is a holder of or a
candidate for any state office or a member of any state board or
commission, or who has not resided in this state for at least three
years.
(3) The board shall elect one of its members as chairperson of the
Board of Educational Lands and Funds. In the absence of the chairperson,
any member of the board may, upon motion duly carried, act in his or her
behalf as such chairperson. It shall keep a record of all proceedings and
orders made by it. No order shall be made except upon the concurrence of
at least three members of the board. It shall make all orders pertaining
to the handling of all lands and funds set apart for educational
-4-

LB830 LB830
2026 2026
purposes.
(4) The board shall maintain an office in Lincoln and shall meet in
its office not less than once each month.
(5) The board may appoint a secretary for the board. The
compensation of the secretary shall be payable in equal installments
monthly, as fixed by the board.
Sec. 6. Section 75-106, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
75-106 Any person who is eligible to hold the office of commissioner
shall also be eligible to hold the office of executive director. The
salary of the executive director shall be fixed by the commission,
payable in equal installments monthly. The executive director shall take
the same oath as the commissioners. The executive director shall keep
full and correct minutes of all transactions and proceedings of the
commission, and it shall be his or her duty to, upon request and being
paid the lawful fees therefor, furnish a transcript, duly authenticated
by the commission, of any public record of the commission and to perform
such duties as may be required by the commission. The executive director
shall charge such fees for furnishing a transcript as are allowed by law
on appeal from the district court to the Court of Appeals and shall turn
such fees into the fund provided for the expenses of the commission.
Sec. 7. Section 80-401.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
80-401.02 There is hereby created a department of government to be
known as the Department of Veterans' Affairs. The chief administrative
officer of the department shall be the director to be known as the
Director of Veterans' Affairs. He or she shall be appointed by the
Governor, subject to confirmation by the Legislature. No person shall be
eligible to receive appointment as director unless such person has the
following qualifications: (1) Resident of the State of Nebraska for at
least five years immediately prior to his or her appointment; (2) citizen
-5-

LB830 LB830
2026 2026
of the United States; and (3) served in the armed forces of the United
States during any of the periods identified in section 80-401.01 and
discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable
from such service. The director shall serve until a new director to
succeed him or her is appointed and has qualified. If a vacancy occurs in
the office of director when the Legislature is not in session, the
Governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting of the
Legislature, when the Governor shall present to the Legislature a
recommendation for the office. The director shall receive an annual
salary to be fixed by the Governor, payable in equal monthly
installments. He or she shall be reimbursed for expenses involved in the
performance of his or her official duties as provided in sections 81-1174
to 81-1177. He or she shall be bonded or insured as required by section
11-201. The director shall appoint state service officers and assistants,
whose appointments shall be approved by the Veterans' Advisory
Commission.
The department shall be the designated state agency to advocate on
behalf of veterans.
Sec. 8. Section 81-183, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-183 (1) Any federal facility which is under the control of the
Military Department and for which state financial support is required
shall be eligible for funds for renewal and maintenance under the
Deferred Building Renewal Act to be paid from the Building Renewal
Allocation Fund.
(2) No building held in trust, property of the Board of Educational
Lands and Funds, nor highways or roads and revenue bond structures shall
receive funds for renewal and maintenance under the Deferred Building
Renewal Act sections 81-173 to 81-190.
Sec. 9. Section 81-186, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-6-

LB830 LB830
2026 2026
81-186 The Committee on Building Maintenance shall meet as
necessary, but not less than four times annually, to monitor the
activities required of the task force, and the agencies, boards, and
commissions who are responsible for the state buildings, and federal
facilities under the control of the Military Department and to review the
proposed rental charges as provided in sections 81-1108.17 and
81-1108.22. The committee shall study progress and propose any necessary
legislation to assure that state-owned buildings and federal facilities
under the control of the Military Department are protected through proper
maintenance.
Sec. 10. Section 83-191, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-191 The members of the Board of Parole shall devote full time to
their duties with such board and shall not engage in any other business
or profession or hold any other public office. No member shall, at the
time of his or her appointment or during his or her tenure, serve as the
representative of any political party or of any executive committee or
governing body thereof or as an executive officer or employee of any
political party, organization, association, or committee. A member shall
resign from the board upon filing as a candidate for any elective public
office. Each member of the board shall receive an annual salary to be
fixed by the Governor. Such salaries shall be paid in equal installments
monthly portions.
Sec. 11. Section 83-227.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-227.01 The Department of Health and Human Services is authorized
to utilize space which is temporarily surplus to the needs of the Lincoln
Regional Center and the Norfolk Regional Center facilities under their
jurisdiction for patients committed to or lawfully confined in the
Beatrice State Developmental Center. Patients so transferred to the
Lincoln Regional Center or the Norfolk Regional Center shall be housed in
-7-

LB830 LB830
2026 2026
facilities separate and apart from facilities used to house patients
committed to such hospital, and after their transfer such patients shall
receive the same type of care, custody, and treatment as they would have
received had they remained at the Beatrice State Developmental Center,
and the charges for their care and maintenance shall be the same as
though they were housed at the Beatrice State Developmental Center, and
the charges shall be collected in the manner provided in this section and
sections 83-227.02, 83-350, and 83-363 to 83-379 83-380.
Sec. 12. Section 83-227.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-227.02 (1) The Department of Health and Human Services is
authorized to use space which is temporarily surplus to the needs of any
institution under its control, except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, for the care, custody, and treatment of the inmates of any
other such institution when space at such latter institution is
inadequate and the facilities of the institution to which transfer is
made are suitable to the needs of the inmate. Inmates so transferred
shall receive the same care, custody, and treatment as they would have
received had they not been transferred. If the cost of the care, custody,
and treatment of such inmate is recoverable by the institution from which
the transfer was made, it shall be recovered in the manner provided in
sections 83-363 to 83-379 83-380.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not be construed to permit
the transfer of inmates to or from any Department of Correctional
Services facility unless expressly authorized by law.
Sec. 13. Section 83-363, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-363 As used in sections 83-227.01, 83-227.02, 83-350, and 83-363
to 83-379 83-380, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(2) State institution means the state hospitals at Lincoln and
-8-

LB830 LB830
2026 2026
Norfolk, the Beatrice State Developmental Center, and such other
institutions as may hereafter be established by the Legislature for the
care and treatment of persons with a mental disorder or persons with an
intellectual disability;
(3) Relative means the spouse of a patient or, if the patient has no
spouse and is under the age of majority at the time he or she is
admitted, the parents of a patient in a state institution; and
(4) Parents means either or both of a patient's natural parents
unless such patient has been legally adopted by other parents, in which
case parents means either or both of the adoptive parents.
Sec. 14. Section 83-364, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-364 When any person is admitted to a state institution or other
inpatient treatment facility pursuant to an order of a mental health
board under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex Offender
Commitment Act or receives treatment prescribed by such institution or
facility following release or without being admitted as a resident
patient, the patient and the patient's relatives shall be liable for the
cost of the care, support, maintenance, and treatment of such person to
the extent and in the manner provided by sections 83-227.01, 83-227.02,
83-350, and 83-363 to 83-379 83-380. Such sections also shall apply to
persons admitted to a state institution as transferees from any state
penal institution or youth rehabilitation and treatment center but only
after the expiration of the time for which the transferees were
originally sentenced or committed.
Sec. 15. Section 83-367, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-367 The liability of each relative, except a spouse, shall cease
when relatives shall have completed payments assessed pursuant to
sections 83-227.01, 83-227.02, 83-350, and 83-363 to 83-379 83-380 for
one hundred eighty months, or when the patient attains the age of
-9-

LB830 LB830
2026 2026
majority, whichever shall occur first.
Sec. 16. Section 83-370, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-370 When any relative willfully fails to furnish to the
department, upon request, the information required by sections 83-227.01,
83-227.02, 83-350, and 83-363 to 83-379 83-380 as to his or her taxable
income, such relative shall be deemed to have ability to pay the entire
cost determined under sections 83-227.01, 83-227.02, 83-350, and 83-363
to 83-379 83-380.
Sec. 17. Section 83-371, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-371 Pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure
Act, the department shall adopt and promulgate appropriate rules and
regulations for making the determinations required by sections 83-227.01,
83-227.02, 83-350, and 83-363 to 83-379 83-380.
Sec. 18. Section 83-375, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-375 When any patient or relative fails to pay the amounts
determined to be due under sections 83-227.01, 83-227.02, 83-350, and
83-363 to 83-379 83-380, the State state of Nebraska may proceed against
such person in the manner authorized by law for the recovery of money
owed to a creditor. The Attorney General shall represent the state in
such actions, but may authorize the county attorney for the county in
which such person resides or owns property to investigate and prosecute
the action on behalf of the state.
Sec. 19. Section 83-377, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-377 In all cases in which a guardian has been named for any
person liable for payments under sections 83-227.01, 83-227.02, 83-350,
and 83-363 to 83-379 83-380, the guardian shall represent such person in
all matters arising under sections 83-227.01, 83-227.02, 83-350, and
-10-

LB830 LB830
2026 2026
83-363 to 83-379 83-380 and shall be liable in the same manner as he or
she would be on any other matters arising from the guardianship.
Sec. 20. Section 83-378, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-378 No person shall be liable for the cost of the care, support,
maintenance, and treatment of any patient except as provided in sections
83-363 to 83-379 83-380, but the amounts determined to be due and unpaid
at the time of the death of a patient or relative shall constitute a
claim against the estate of such patient or relative. The department may
accept voluntary payments on behalf of any patient from any person who is
not liable for payments.
Sec. 21. Section 83-379, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-379 In the absence of fraud, a patient and the patient's his
relatives shall be liable only to the extent of assessments actually made
against them respectively, in accordance with sections 83-227.01,
83-227.02, 83-350, and 83-363 to 83-379 83-380. For the purposes of
sections 83-227.01, 83-227.02, 83-350, and 83-363 to 83-379 83-380, it
shall be deemed fraudulent for any patient or the patient's his relatives
to transfer any assets or property to another person for the purpose of
affecting the determination of ability to pay. When it is determined that
such a fraudulent transfer has been made, the department shall consider
the value of such assets or property transferred in determining the
ability to pay under section 83-368 or 83-369.
Sec. 22. Section 83-380.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-380.01 Upon the discharge from a treatment facility, an indigent
person who has received mental-health-board-ordered treatment may file an
affidavit with the Department of Health and Human Services or the mental
health board requesting that prescription medicine which the regional
center treating psychiatrist or the patient's treating physician has
-11-

LB830 LB830
2026 2026
prescribed as necessary for the patient's mental health treatment be
provided to him or her. Such affidavit shall include the following: (1)
That the patient qualifies as an indigent person who is unable to pay
under the same standards of ability to pay as set forth in sections
83-363 to 83-379 83-380; and (2) that such prescription medicine has been
prescribed by the regional center's treatment psychiatrist or the
patient's treating physician as necessary for the patient's mental health
treatment. The mental health board shall refer such requests it receives
to the Department of Health and Human Services and the department shall
provide such prescription medicine as may be necessary for such former
patient's mental health treatment so long as he or she remains an
outpatient and his or her treating physician continues to prescribe and
certify that such prescription medicine is necessary for the patient's
mental health treatment and he or she continues to be an indigent person
as determined under the same standards of ability to pay as set forth in
sections 83-363 to 83-379 83-380. The Department of Health and Human
Services may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act, including, but not limited to, hearings necessary to
determine whether such person is qualified to receive such medications
and whether such medication is necessary for the patient's mental health
treatment.
Sec. 23. Section 84-101.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-101.01 Until January 4, 2007, the annual salary of the Governor
shall be eighty-five thousand dollars. Commencing January 4, 2007, the
annual salary of the Governor shall be one hundred five thousand dollars.
Such salary shall be payable in equal monthly installments.
Sec. 24. Section 84-201.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-201.01 Until January 4, 2007, the annual salary of the Attorney
-12-

LB830 LB830
2026 2026
General shall be seventy-five thousand dollars. Commencing January 4,
2007, the annual salary of the Attorney General shall be ninety-five
thousand dollars. The salary of the Attorney General shall be payable in
equal monthly installments.
Sec. 25. Section 84-206, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-206 The Attorney General shall appoint a deputy attorney general,
who shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201. A copy of
the appointment shall be deposited in the office of the Secretary of
State. The deputy may do and perform, in the absence of the Attorney
General, all the acts and duties that may be authorized and required to
be performed by the Attorney General. The Attorney General shall be
responsible for all acts of such deputy. The deputy shall receive a
salary of such amount as shall be fixed by the Attorney General, to be
paid in equal installments on a monthly basis by warrant of the Director
of Administrative Services on the State Treasurer. The salary of the
deputy attorney general and each full-time assistant attorney general
shall be not less than twenty thousand dollars.
Sec. 26. Section 84-314, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-314 The Auditor of Public Accounts shall have the power to
appoint a deputy, who shall give a bond or equivalent commercial
insurance policy to the State of Nebraska (1) with good and sufficient
surety, (2) in the amount required by section 11-119, (3) to be approved
by the Governor, and (4) deposited with the Secretary of State. When so
appointed the deputy may do and perform in the absence of the auditor
such acts herein authorized and required of the auditor, as the auditor
may authorize him or her to do, subject to the same restrictions. The
deputy auditor shall receive a salary of such amount as shall be fixed by
the Auditor of Public Accounts, to be paid in equal installments monthly
by warrant of the auditor on the State Treasurer. The deputy auditor
-13-

LB830 LB830
2026 2026
shall have had not less than five years' experience either as an auditor
or in an executive capacity involving responsibility for directing the
work of others engaged in governmental accounting or auditing, or both,
and in addition shall be a certified public accountant.
Sec. 27. Section 84-509, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-509 The deputy secretary of state shall receive a salary of such
amount as shall be fixed by the Secretary of State, to be paid in equal
installments monthly by warrant of the Director of Administrative
Services on the State Treasurer.
Sec. 28. Section 84-608, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-608 The State Treasurer shall have the power to appoint a deputy.
The deputy may do and perform, in the absence of the treasurer, all of
the acts and duties that the deputy he may be authorized to perform by
the treasurer, subject to the same restrictions as the treasurer, and the
treasurer shall be responsible for all the official acts of the his
deputy. Such deputy treasurer shall receive a salary of such amount as
shall be fixed by the State Treasurer, payable in equal installments
monthly by warrant of the Director of Administrative Services on the
State Treasurer.
Sec. 29. Section 84-721, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-721 Until January 4, 2007, there shall be paid as salaries to
certain constitutional officers as follows: Secretary of State, the sum
of sixty-five thousand dollars per year; Auditor of Public Accounts, the
sum of sixty thousand dollars per year; State Treasurer, the sum of sixty
thousand dollars per year; and Lieutenant Governor, the sum of sixty
thousand dollars per year. Commencing January 4, 2007, there shall be
paid as salaries to certain constitutional officers as follows: Secretary
of State, the sum of eighty-five thousand dollars per year; Auditor of
-14-

LB830 LB830
2026 2026
Public Accounts, the sum of eighty-five thousand dollars per year; State
Treasurer, the sum of eighty-five thousand dollars per year; and
Lieutenant Governor, the sum of seventy-five thousand dollars per year.
Such salaries shall be payable in equal monthly installments.
Sec. 30. Original sections 50-123.01, 53-112, 71-1131, 75-106,
80-401.02, 81-183, 81-186, 83-191, 83-227.01, 83-227.02, 83-363, 83-364,
83-367, 83-370, 83-371, 83-375, 83-377, 83-378, 83-379, 83-380.01,
84-101.01, 84-201.01, 84-206, 84-314, 84-509, 84-608, and 84-721, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, section 72-201, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and section 24-201.01, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, are repealed.
Sec. 31. The following section is outright repealed: Section
83-380, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-15-